Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-212
Hospitals providing for supportive medical services to patients; exempt from in lieu of tax payment.

Space provided for supportive medical services to patients in hospitals shall be exempt from section 77-211.

Laws 1973, LB 294, § 2.